el: Υλικό υποστήριξης: Πλαστικό; Πολυεστέρας; Πολυουρεθάνη (PU); Πολυβινυλοχλωρίδιο (PVC); Καουτσούκ; Άλλο
zh-TW: 背膠材料: 塑膠; 聚酯; 聚氨酯 (PU); 聚氯乙烯 (PVC); 橡膠; 其他
hr-HR: Materijal poleđine: Plastika; Poliester; Poliuretan (PU); Polivinil klorid (PVC); Guma; Ostalo
vi: Vật liệu nền: Nhựa; Polyester; Polyurethane (PU); Polyvinyl chloride (PVC); Cao su; Khác
de: Trägermaterial: Kunststoff; Polyester; Polyurethan (PU); Polyvinylchlorid (PVC); Gummi; Sonstiges
en: Backing material: Plastic; Polyester; Polyurethane (PU); Polyvinyl chloride (PVC); Rubber; Other
pl: Materiał podkładowy: Tworzywo sztuczne; Poliester; Poliuretan (PU); Polichlorek winylu (PVC); Guma; Inne
th: วัสดุแผ่นรองรับ: พลาสติก; โพลีเอสเตอร์; โพลิยูรีเทน (PU); โพลิไวนิลคลอไรด์ (PVC); ยาง; อื่นๆ
da: Bagsidemateriale: Plast; Polyester; Polyurethan (PU); Polyvinylklorid (PVC); Gummi; Andet
sl-SI: Material podlage: Plastika; Poliester; Poliuretan (PU); Polivinilklorid (PVC); Guma; Drugo
bg-BG: Материал на подложката: Пластмаса; Полиестер; Полиуретан (PU); Поливинилхлорид (PVC); Каучук; Други
nl: Materiaal achterkant: Plastic; Polyester; Polyurethaan (PU); Polyvinylchloride (PVC); Rubber; Andere
pt-PT: Material de suporte: Plástico; Poliéster; Poliuretano (PU); Cloruro de polivinilo (PVC); Borracha; Outro
ko: 뒷면 재료: 플라스틱; 폴리에스테르; 폴리우레탄(PU); 폴리염화비닐(PVC); 고무; 기타
cs: Podkladový materiál: Plast; Polyester; Polyuretan (PU); Polyvinylchlorid (PVC); Guma; Jiné
hu: Hátoldal anyaga: Műanyag; Poliészter; Poliuretán (PU); Polivinil-klorid (PVC); Gumi; Egyéb
fi: Vahvistemateriaali: Muovi; Polyesteri; Polyuretaani (PU); Polyvinyylikloridi (PVC); Kumi; Muu
sk-SK: Materiál zadnej časti: Plast; Polyester; Polyuretán (PU); Polyvinylchlorid (PVC); Guma; Iné
ja: 裏当て材: プラスチック; ポリエステル; ポリウレタン (PU); ポリ塩化ビニル (PVC); ゴム; その他
it: Materiale del supporto: Plastica; Poliestere; Poliuretano (PU); Cloruro di polivinile (PVC); Gomma; Altro
nb: Bakmateriale: Plast; Polyester; Polyuretan (PU); Polyvinylklorid (PVC); Gummi; Annet
pt-BR: Material protetor: Plástico; Poliéster; Poliuretano (PU); Cloreto de polivinila (PVC); Borracha; Outro
zh-CN: 背衬材料: 塑料; 聚酯纤维; 聚氨酯 (PU); 聚氯乙烯 (PVC); 橡胶; 其他
fr: Matériau de support: Plastique; Polyester; Polyuréthane (PU); Chlorure de polyvinyle (PVC); Caoutchouc; Autre
lt-LT: Pagrindo medžiaga: Plastikas; Poliesteris; Poliuretanas (PU); Polivinilchloridas (PVC); Kaučiukas; Kita
ru: Материал оборотной стороны: Пластик; Полиэстер; Полиуретан (ПУ); Поливинилхлорид (ПВХ); Резина; Другое
ro-RO: Material spate: Plastic; Poliester; Poliuretan (PU); Clorură de polivinil (PVC); Cauciuc; Altele
es: Material del soporte: Plástico; Poliéster; Poliuretano (PU); Cloruro de polivinilo (PVC); Goma; Otros
sv: Stödmaterial: Plast; Polyester; Polyuretan (PU); Polyvinylklorid (PVC); Gummi; Övrigt
tr: Destek malzemesi: Plastik; Poliyester; Poliüretan (PU); Polivinil klorür (PVC); Kauçuk; Diğer